Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Article 2. Tear Bombs

§ 3091.
Permit.

No person shall manufacture, possess, use, or transport bombs, commonly called tear bombs, without first securing a written permit from the Commissioner of Public Safety.
Such permits shall be of such form and conditions and for such length of time as the Commissioner of Public Safety may prescribe, and he or she may revoke for cause any permit so granted.

§ 3092.
Penalties.

A person who violates the provisions of section 3091 of this title may be fined not more than $1,000.00 or imprisoned for a period not exceeding one year, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 223

(Adj. Sess.), § 23.